Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-8,108
Land surveying; declaration of policy; prohibited acts.

In order to safeguard life, health, and property, any person practicing or offering to practice land surveying in this state shall submit evidence that he or she is qualified to practice and shall be registered as provided in the Land Surveyors Regulation Act. It shall be unlawful for any person to practice or to offer to practice land surveying in this state unless such person has been duly registered under the act.

Laws 1957, c. 383, § 1, p. 1332;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB138, § 6.
August 30, 2015